Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [135A.65] ELECTED OFFICIAL TOWN HALL MEETINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Jurisdiction" means the geographic area of the political subdivision or district represented by an elected official in the state of Minnesota. The jurisdiction of an official elected statewide includes the entire state. new text end new text begin (c) "Town hall meeting" means an official informational event, open to members of the public and hosted by an elected official, but where no official public business will be transacted. An event in which a person other than the elected official is a primary host or speaker is not a town hall meeting under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Scope; University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin This section applies to institutions governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities. Institutions governed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota are requested to comply with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Town hall meeting accommodation requirements. new text end new text begin Upon request by an elected official, a public postsecondary institution within the official's jurisdiction must permit the elected official to hold a town hall meeting in an available and appropriate space on the institution's campus free of charge. The institution must waive any parking fees it would otherwise charge to members of the public attending a town hall meeting under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Limitations; specifications. new text end new text begin (a) The following limitations and specifications apply to subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) An elected official: new text end new text begin (1) may hold no more than three town hall meetings per calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) must make a request for space to the public postsecondary institution no later than 30 days prior to the proposed date of the town hall meeting; and new text end new text begin (3) may direct their request to the nearest public postsecondary institution if the elected official does not have a public postsecondary institution within their jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (c) A public postsecondary institution: new text end new text begin (1) is not required to cancel, alter, or reschedule any preexisting reservation of a space in order to accommodate an elected official's requested town hall meeting; and new text end new text begin (2) must provide a space that is appropriate to accommodate the elected official's requested town hall meeting based on a reasonable estimate of the town hall meeting's attendance. new text end